District of Columbia statutes.
42-1902.14

Recordation of plat and plans; contents; certification; when new plat, survey, and recordation necessary; provisions applicable to limited common elements; filing with Office of Surveyor.

(a)

There shall be recorded promptly upon recordation of the declaration, 1 or more plats of survey showing the location and dimensions of the submitted land, the location and dimensions of any convertible lands within the submitted land, the location and dimensions of any existing improvements, the intended location and dimensions of any contemplated improvements which are to be located on any portion of the submitted land other than within the boundaries of any convertible lands, and, to the extent feasible, the location and dimensions of all easements appurtenant to the submitted land or otherwise submitted to this chapter as a part of the common elements. If the submitted land is not contiguous, then the plats shall indicate the distances between the parcels constituting the submitted land. The plats shall label every convertible land as a convertible land, and if there be more than 1 such land the plats shall label each such land with 1 or more letters or numbers, or both, different from those designating any other convertible land and different also from the identifying number of any unit. The plats shall show the location and dimensions of any withdrawable lands, and shall label each such land with 1 or more letters or numbers, or both, different from those designating any other convertible land and different also from the identifying number of any unit. The plats shall show the location and dimensions of any withdrawable lands, and shall label each such land as a withdrawable land. If, with respect to any portion or portions, but less than all, of the submitted land, the unit owners are to own only an estate for years, the plats shall show the location and dimensions of any such portions, and shall label each such portion as a leased land. If there is more than 1 withdrawable land, or more than 1 leased land, the plats shall label each such land with 1 or more letters or numbers, or both, different from those designating any convertible land or other withdrawable or leased land, and different also from the identifying number of any unit. The plats shall show all easements to which the submitted land or any portion thereof is subject, and shall show the location and dimensions of all such easements to the extent feasible. The plats shall also show all encroachments by or on any portion of the condominium. In the case of any improvements located or to be located on any portion of the submitted land other than within the boundaries of any convertible lands, the plats shall indicate which, if any, have not been begun by the use of the phrase “not yet begun,” and which, if any, have been begun but have not been substantially completed by the use of the phrase “not yet completed.” In the case of any units the vertical boundaries of which lie wholly or partially outside of structures for which plans pursuant to subsection (b) of this section are simultaneously recorded, the plats shall show the location and dimensions of such vertical boundaries to the extent that they are not shown on such plans, and the units or portions thereof thus depicted shall bear their identifying numbers. Each plat shall be certified as to its accuracy and compliance with the provisions of this subsection by a registered land surveyor, and the said surveyor shall certify that all units or portions thereof depicted thereon pursuant to the preceding sentence of this subsection have been substantially completed. The specification within this subsection of items that shall be shown on the plats shall not be construed to mean that the plats shall not also show all other items customarily shown or hereafter required for land title surveys.

(b)

There shall also be recorded, promptly upon recordation of the declaration, plans of every structure which contains or constitutes all or part of any unit or units, and which is located on any portion of the submitted land other than within the boundaries of any convertible lands. The plans shall show the location and dimensions of the vertical boundaries of each unit to the extent that such boundaries lie within or coincide with the boundaries of such structures, and the units or portions thereof thus depicted shall bear their identifying numbers. In addition, each convertible space thus depicted shall be labeled a convertible space. The horizontal boundaries of each unit having horizontal boundaries shall be identified on the plans with reference to established datum. Unless the condominium instruments expressly provide otherwise, it shall be presumed that in the case of any unit not wholly contained within or constituting 1 or more such structures, the horizontal boundaries thus identified extend, in the case of each such unit, at the same elevation with regard to any part of such unit lying outside of such structures, subject to the following exception: in the case of any such unit which does not lie over any other unit other than basement units, it shall be presumed that the lower horizontal boundary, if any, of that unit lies at the level of the ground with regard to any part of that unit lying outside of such structures. The plans shall be certified as to their accuracy and compliance with the provisions of this subsection by a registered architect or registered engineer, and the said architect or engineer shall certify that all units or portions thereof depicted thereon have been substantially completed.

(c)

When converting all or any portion of any convertible land, or adding additional land to an expandable condominium, the declarant shall record new plats of survey conforming to the requirements of subsection (a) of this section. In any case where less than all of a convertible land is being converted, such plats shall show the location and dimensions of the remaining portion or portions of such land in addition to otherwise conforming with the requirements of subsection (a) of this section. At the same time, the declarant shall record, with regard to any structures on the land being converted, or added, either plans conforming to the requirements of subsection (b) of this section, or certifications, conforming to the certification requirements of said subsection, of plans previously recorded pursuant to § 42-1902.15.

(d)

When converting all or any portion of any convertible space into 1 or more units or limited common elements, the declarant shall record, with regard to the structure or portion thereof constituting that convertible space, plans showing the location and dimensions of the vertical boundaries of each unit or limited common elements formed out of such space. Such plans shall be certified as to their accuracy and compliance with the provisions of this subsection by a registered architect or registered engineer.

(e)

For the purposes of subsections (a), (b), and (c) of this section, all provisions and requirements relating to units shall be deemed equally applicable to limited common elements. The limited common elements shall be labeled as such, and each limited common element depicted on the plats and plans shall bear the identifying number or numbers of the unit or units to which it is assigned, if it has been assigned, unless the provisions of § 42-1902.06(5) make such designations unnecessary.

(f)

The Office of the Surveyor shall receive plats and plans filed pursuant to this chapter. Unless such plats and plans are filed pursuant to § 42-1902.15, the Office of the Surveyor shall ascertain whether such plats and plans contain the certification required by subsections (a) and (b) of this section. If plats and plans are filed pursuant to § 42-1902.15 or if plats and plans are filed with the required certification, the Office of the Surveyor shall record such plats and plans without further certification or review. If plats and plans filed pursuant to § 42-1902.15 are thereafter certified as required by this section, the Office of the Surveyor shall record such certification with such plats and plans without further certification or review.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-89, title II, § 214, 23 DCR 9532b
This section is referenced in § 42-1901.02, § 42-1902.01, § 42-1902.10, § 42-1902.11, § 42-1902.12, § 42-1902.15, § 42-1902.17, § 42-1902.18, § 42-1902.19, § 42-1903.01, § 42-1903.05, and § 42-1904.03.
1981 Ed., § 45-1824.
1973 Ed., § 5-1224.